Hawaii statutes.
[§356D-47] Government aid; political
subdivisions. Any political subdivision may appropriate moneys for the
purposes of meeting any local participation in housing costs or expenses
required to obtain assistance from the federal government in the development
and administration of state low-income housing projects and programs under this
subpart, or of providing funds for use by the authority in developing and
administering state low-income housing projects. [L 2006, c 180, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next